Maryland, session 2025, HB1394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 26. NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS – UNAUTHORIZED SUPPORT OF
ISRAELI SETTLEMENT ACTIVITY.
3–2601.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1394*

HOUSE BILL 1394
INDICATED.
(2) “NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION EXEMPT
FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OR (4) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(3) “OCCUPIED TERRITORY” MEANS THE ISRAELI–OCCUPIED WEST
BANK, INCLUDING EAST JERUSALEM.
(4) (I) “PROTECTED PERSONS” MEANS INDIVIDUALS PROTECTED
UNDER GENEVA CONVENTION (IV) RELATIVE TO THE PROTECTION OF CIVILIAN
PERSONS IN TIME OF WAR, 12 AUGUST 1949, 6 U.S.T. 3516.
(II) “PROTECTED PERSONS” INCLUDES CIVILIANS IN OCCUPIED
TERRITORY IN ACCORDANCE WITH INTERNATIONAL LAW.
(5) “UNAUTHORIZED SUPPORT OF ISRAELI SETTLEMENT ACTIVITY”
MEANS AIDING AND ABETTING ACTIVITY OF THE GOVERNMENT OF ISRAEL, OR A
CITIZEN OF ISRAEL, THAT IS BANNED UNDER THE GENEVA CONVENTIONS SIGNED
AUGUST 12, 1949, AS AMENDED, AND THEIR ADDITIONAL PROTOCOLS, TO WHICH
THE UNITED STATES IS A PARTY, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING ACTIVITY:
(I) THE UNLAWFUL TRANSFER OF ISRAELI CIVILIANS INTO
OCCUPIED TERRITORY;
(II) ACTS OF VIOLENCE AGAINST PROTECTED PERSONS BY
CITIZENS OF ISRAEL LIVING IN OCCUPIED TERRITORIES, INCLUDING:
1. ABDUCTION;
2. MURDER;
3. ASSAULT;
4. ARSON; AND
5. THE COMMISSION OF ANY ACT DESCRIBED IN ITEMS 1
THROUGH 4 OF THIS ITEM USING A FIREARM OR EXPLOSIVE DEVICE;
(III) CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY INCLUDING:
1. THE KILLING OR HARMING OF ANIMALS AND
LIVESTOCK;

HOUSE BILL 1394 3
2. THE DESTRUCTION OF TREES AND CROPS;
3. THE APPROPRIATION, EXPROPRIATION, SEIZURE,
DESTRUCTION, DEMOLITION, DISMANTLEMENT, OR CONFISCATION, IN WHOLE OR IN
PART, OF PRIVATE PROPERTY, INCLUDING:
A. HOMES;
B. APARTMENT BUILDINGS;
C. COMMERCIAL PROPERTY;
D. FOOD MARKETS; AND
E. ANIMAL SHELTERS; AND
4. BLOCKING ACCESS TO PALESTINIAN LANDS BY
FENCING, STRUCTURES, OR OTHER MEANS;
(IV) THE UNILATERAL ACQUISITION AND ANNEXATION OF LAND
IN OCCUPIED TERRITORY;
(V) THE FORCED TRANSFER OR EVICTION OF PROTECTED
PERSONS WITHIN OCCUPIED TERRITORY, OR THE DEPORTATION OF PROTECTED
PERSONS FROM OCCUPIED TERRITORY; AND
(VI) THE DESTRUCTION OF INFRASTRUCTURE WITHIN
OCCUPIED TERRITORY INCLUDING THE DESTRUCTION OF:
1. HOSPITALS AND OTHER MEDICAL FACILITIES;
2. WATER AND SEWAGE SYSTEM ELEMENTS;
3. ELECTRICAL LINES;
4. ROADS;
5. SCHOOLS; AND
6. NETWORK FACILITIES.
(B) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION REGISTERED WITH THE SECRETARY OF
STATE TO SOLICIT CHARITABLE DONATIONS IN THE STATE MAY NOT KNOWINGLY

HOUSE BILL 1394
ENGAGE IN UNAUTHORIZED SUPPORT OF ISRAELI SETTLEMENT ACTIVITY.
(C) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND DAMAGES ON BEHALF OF THE STATE OR ANY OF ITS
POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS AGAINST A DIRECTOR, AN OFFICER, A PARTNER, A
TRUSTEE, A MANAGER, OR ANY OTHER AGENT OF A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT
VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IN AN ACTION FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT SEEK LESS THAN $1,000,000 IN
DAMAGES.
(D) (1) A PERSON HARMED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND ACTUAL DAMAGES
AGAINST A DIRECTOR, AN OFFICER, A PARTNER, A TRUSTEE, A MANAGER, OR ANY
OTHER AGENT OF A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND ACTUAL DAMAGES, A
COURT MAY AWARD ATTORNEY’S FEES TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF.
(E) ON NOTICE FROM THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR A PREVAILING
PLAINTIFF OF A JUDGMENT ENTERED AGAINST A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL REMOVE THE NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION FROM THE REGISTRY OF CHARITABLE SOLICITATION.
(F) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) MAY BE BROUGHT IN ANY COUNTY IN THE STATE; AND
(2) SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 10 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE
OCCURRENCE OF THE ACT ON WHICH THE CLAIM IS BASED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.